Alaska statutes. Title 6. Banks and Financial Institutions.
Article 1. Licensing.

Sec. 06.60.010.
Mortgage lender or mortgage broker license required.

Unless exempt under AS

06.60.015

, a person may not operate in the state as a mortgage lender or mortgage broker with respect to a dwelling located in the state unless the person is licensed as a mortgage lender or mortgage broker under this chapter.

A mortgage lender or mortgage broker required to be licensed under this chapter shall register with the registry and maintain a valid unique identifier issued by the registry.

A mortgage license may cover more than one location of a mortgage licensee.

A person who operates as both a mortgage lender and a mortgage broker is only required to obtain one mortgage license.

History.

(§ 2 ch 50 SLA 2007; am § 3 ch 61 SLA 2010)

Administrative Code. —

For licensing, see 3 AAC 14, art. 1.

For originator competency testing and continuing education, see 3 AAC 14, art. 3.

Sec. 06.60.012.
Mortgage loan originator license required.

Unless exempt under AS

06.60.015

, an individual may not operate in the state as a mortgage loan originator with respect to a dwelling located in the state unless the individual is licensed as a mortgage loan originator under this chapter.

An individual required to be licensed as a mortgage loan originator shall

register with the registry and maintain a valid unique identifier issued by the registry;

work under

an exclusive contract for, or as an employee of, a mortgage licensee; or

an exclusive contract for a registered depository institution; and

be sponsored in the registry by a mortgage licensee under a sponsorship approved in the registry by the department or be sponsored by a registered depository institution under AS

06.60.014

; in this paragraph, “sponsored” means authorized to conduct business as a mortgage loan originator under the supervision of a mortgage licensee or a registered depository institution.

History.

(§ 4 ch 61 SLA 2010; am § 1 ch 51 SLA 2016)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2016 amendment, effective January 1, 2017, in (b)(2), inserted “(A) an” following “work under”; inserted “or (B) an exclusive contract for a registered depository institution;” following “mortgage licensee”; in (b)(3), inserted “or be sponsored by a registered depository institution under AS

06.60.014

” following “department”; inserted “or a registered depository institution” at the end of the paragraph.

Sec. 06.60.013.
Loan processors or underwriters.

A loan processor or underwriter who is an independent contractor may not operate as a loan processor or underwriter unless the independent contractor loan processor or underwriter is licensed as a mortgage loan originator under this chapter. An independent contractor loan processor or underwriter licensed as a mortgage loan originator shall register with the registry and maintain a valid unique identifier issued by the registry.

An individual engaged solely in loan processor or underwriter activities who is not an independent contractor is not required to be licensed as a mortgage loan originator under this chapter if the individual does not represent to the public, through advertising or other means of communicating or providing information, including the use of the Internet, business cards, stationery, brochures, signs, rate lists, or other promotional items, that the individual can or will perform any of the activities of a mortgage loan originator.

History.

(§ 4 ch 61 SLA 2010)

Effective dates. —

Section 92, ch. 61, SLA 2010 makes this section effective July 1, 2010.

Sec. 06.60.014.
Registered depository institutions.

A depository institution may sponsor a mortgage loan originator under AS

06.60.012(b)

if the depository institution is registered with the department under this section, has an exclusive written contract to sponsor a mortgage loan originator licensed under this chapter, is otherwise in compliance with this chapter, and satisfies the other requirements of this section. Registration under this section does not affect the exemption of the depository institution under AS

06.60.015(a)

.

To register under (a) of this section, a depository institution shall

complete a registration form established by the department; the form must identify the mortgage loan originator to be sponsored by the depository institution and each mortgage lending location of the registered depository institution; and

pay a registration fee established by the department.

Registration under (b) of this section expires after one year. To renew a registration, the depository institution shall file a renewal application with the department and pay a renewal fee established by the department.

The department may deny an initial or renewal registration under this section or may suspend or revoke the registration of a depository institution that is registered under (b) of this section if the department determines that the depository institution

failed to satisfy a requirement of this section;

failed to supervise its sponsored mortgage loan originator adequately; or

made a material misstatement or withheld information on the application for registration, on an application for the renewal of the registration, or on another document required to be filed with the department.

History.

(§ 2 ch 51 SLA 2016)

Effective dates. —

Section 22, ch. 51, SLA 2016 makes this section effective January 1, 2017.

Sec. 06.60.015.
Exemptions.

The following persons are exempt from the mortgage lender or mortgage broker licensing requirements of this chapter:

a depository institution;

a subsidiary that is

owned and controlled by a depository institution; and

regulated by a federal banking agency;

an institution regulated by the Farm Credit Administration;

a federal, state, or local government agency, including an agency that arranges or provides financing for mortgage loans; or

a bona fide nonprofit organization.

The following are exempt from the mortgage loan originator licensing requirements of this chapter:

an individual who is a registered mortgage loan originator, when acting for an entity described in (a)(1), (2), or (3) of this section;

an individual who offers or negotiates terms of a residential mortgage loan with or on behalf of an immediate family member of the individual; in this paragraph, “immediate family member” means a spouse, child, stepchild, sibling, stepsibling, parent, stepparent, grandparent, or grandchild;

an individual seller who offers or negotiates terms of a residential mortgage loan secured by a dwelling that serves as the individual’s residence;

a seller, including a natural person, estate, trust, corporation, or another entity, that offers or negotiates the terms of a residential mortgage loan for the sale of residential property owned by the seller, if

the loan is secured by a dwelling on the property;

the seller self-finances the loan;

during any 12-month period, the seller finances five or fewer sales under this paragraph;

in the ordinary course of a business of the seller, the seller has not

constructed the dwelling that secures the loan on the property; or

acted as a contractor for the construction of the dwelling that secures the loan on the property;

the loan has an interest rate that is fixed for the full term of the loan;

the loan does not

have a payment schedule that results in negative amortization; or

allow or impose a prepayment penalty; and

the seller determines that the purchaser or potential purchaser has a reasonable ability to repay the loan; the seller shall keep confidential and may not disclose to another person at any time credit scores, salary information, tax records, and other financial information of the purchaser or potential purchaser obtained by the seller under this subparagraph for the purpose of determining whether the purchaser or potential purchaser has a reasonable ability to repay the loan; however, the seller may disclose the financial information when, and only to the extent that,

the purchaser or potential purchaser authorizes the disclosure in writing;

the seller makes the disclosure to obtain professional advice relating to a dispute with the purchaser or potential purchaser;

federal or state law requires the disclosure; or

a court orders the disclosure;

an individual who is a licensed attorney who negotiates the terms of a residential mortgage loan on behalf of a client as an ancillary matter to the attorney’s representation of the client, unless the attorney is compensated by a lender, a mortgage broker, or another mortgage loan originator or by an agent of a lender, a mortgage broker, or another mortgage loan originator;

an employee of a federal, state, or local government agency that is exempt under (a)(4) of this section from the mortgage lender or mortgage broker licensing requirements of this chapter;

an employee of a bona fide nonprofit organization if the employee acts as a mortgage loan originator only with respect to

the employee’s duties to the bona fide nonprofit organization; and

residential mortgage loans that have terms that are favorable to the borrower by being consistent with mortgage loan origination for a public or charitable purpose rather than in a commercial context.

For a nonprofit organization to qualify as a bona fide nonprofit organization under (a)(5) of this section, the department shall determine that the nonprofit organization

has and maintains the status of a tax-exempt organization under 26 U.S.C. 501(c)(3) (Internal Revenue Code);

promotes affordable housing or provides home ownership education or similar services;

conducts its activities in a manner that serves a public or charitable purpose, rather than a commercial purpose, by offering mortgages that are not readily available from other lenders;

receives funding, receives revenue, and charges fees in a manner that does not provide an incentive for the organization or its employees to act other than in the best interests of its clients;

compensates its employees in a manner that does not provide an incentive to its employees to act other than in the best interests of its clients;

provides or identifies for a borrower residential mortgage loans with terms favorable to the borrower and comparable to mortgage loans and housing assistance provided under government housing assistance programs; for residential mortgage loans to have terms that are favorable to the borrower, the terms must be consistent with mortgage loan origination for a public or charitable purpose, rather than in a commercial context, and provide for interest rates that are less than the current market rate; and

meets other standards that the department determines are appropriate.

The department may establish by regulation the information that an organization must provide to qualify as a bona fide nonprofit organization under (c) of this section.

The department shall establish by regulation

the procedure for determining that an organization meets the criteria identified under (c) of this section;

the period for which the determination made under (c) of this section remains in effect and the fee to be paid by the organization;

how often and under what circumstances the department will examine the books and activities of the organization to determine that the organization continues to meet the criteria identified under (c) of this section; and

the procedure for denying an organization the status of a bona fide nonprofit organization, for suspending or revoking an organization’s status as a bona fide nonprofit organization if the organization does not continue to meet the criteria identified under (c) of this section, and for taking disciplinary action against an organization arising out of a violation of (c) — (e) of this section; the provisions of AS 44.62 (Administrative Procedure Act) apply to an action of the department under this paragraph.

History.

(§ 2 ch 50 SLA 2007; am § 5 ch 61 SLA 2010; am § 3 ch 51 SLA 2016; am § 2 ch 9 SLA 2019; am §§ 1 — 4 ch 9 SLA 2019)

Revisor's notes. —

In subsection (b), paragraph (4)(G), a missing clause beginning with “the seller shall keep confidential…” ending with subparagraphs (i) – (iv),
that was added by sec. 2,
ch. 9, SLA 2019, was retained in sec. 3
ch. 9 SLA 2019, effective January 1, 2020, to correct a manifest error.

Administrative Code. —

For licensing, see 3 AAC 14, art. 1.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2016 amendment, effective January 1, 2017, in (a), added (4) and made a related change.

The 2019 amendment, effective June 29, 2019, in (b), added (b)(4), effective retroactively to July 1, 2008, added (b)(6) and made stylistic changes.

The 2019 amendment, effective January 1, 2020, added (a)(5); added (b)(7); added (c) through (e).

Editor's notes.

Section 7,
ch. 9 SLA 2019, makes (b)(4) retroactive to July 1, 2008.

Sec. 06.60.016.
Registry.

The department may participate in the registry and pay the fees required for participation in the registry.

The department

may establish relationships or contracts with the registry or other entities designated by the registry to collect and maintain records and process transaction fees or other fees related to licensees or other persons subject to this chapter;

shall require mortgage licensees and mortgage loan originators to register with the registry; and

shall establish by regulation a process that allows mortgage licensees and mortgage loan originators to challenge information entered into the registry by the department.

The department may adopt emergency regulations under AS 44.62 (Administrative Procedure Act) to implement this section, including emergency regulations for the assessment of fees.

History.

(§ 6 ch 61 SLA 2010)

Sec. 06.60.017.
Small mortgage lenders and originators. [Repealed, § 87 ch 61 SLA 2010.]

Sec. 06.60.020.
Application for license.

An application for a license under this chapter must

be on the form prescribed by the department and the registry;

contain complete information regarding the applicant;

include fingerprints of the applicant, as needed to conduct a background check; and

contain other information or supporting material that the department may require concerning the applicant, including the organization and operations of an applicant for a mortgage license and the financial responsibility, background, experience, and activities of the applicant.

In this section, “applicant” includes a control person of an applicant for a mortgage license.

History.

(§ 2 ch 50 SLA 2007; am § 7 ch 61 SLA 2010)

Administrative Code. —

For licensing, see 3 AAC 14, art. 1.

Sec. 06.60.025.
Application for originator license. [Repealed, § 87 ch 61 SLA 2010.]

Sec. 06.60.026.
Transfer of mortgage loan originator license.

A person who holds a mortgage loan originator license may not transfer or assign the mortgage loan originator license.

History.

(§ 2 ch 50 SLA 2007; am § 8 ch 61 SLA 2010)

Sec. 06.60.027.
Background checks.

To apply for a mortgage loan originator license or a mortgage license, the applicant shall, at a minimum, furnish information concerning the applicant’s identity to the registry or the department, including

fingerprints for submission to the Federal Bureau of Investigation and any governmental agency or entity authorized to receive that information for a state, national, and international criminal history background check; and

personal history and experience in a form prescribed by the registry and authorization for the registry and the department to obtain

an independent credit report from a consumer reporting agency; and

information related to administrative, civil, or criminal findings by a governmental jurisdiction.

For the purposes of this section, the department may use the registry as an agent for requesting information from and distributing information to the United States Department of Justice, another governmental agency, or another source directed by the department.

As part of the investigation of an application for a license under this chapter, the department or the registry shall

submit fingerprints of the applicant and a control person of the applicant to the governmental agency or entity authorized to receive the fingerprints for a state, national, or international criminal history background check under (a)(1) of this section; and

obtain an independent credit report and other information related to administrative, civil, or criminal findings regarding the applicant and each control person of the applicant under (a)(2) of this section.

History.

(§ 2 ch 50 SLA 2007; am § 9 ch 61 SLA 2010)

Editor’s notes. —

Section 88(c), ch. 61, SLA 2010, provides that this section “does not apply to the renewal of a mortgage license valid on July 1, 2010, except for a mortgage license application amendment submitted on or after July 1, 2010, requesting approval of a change of a control person.”
See § 88(c), ch. 61, SLA 2010, in the 2010 Temporary and Special Acts.

Sec. 06.60.030.
Investigation.

The department shall investigate an applicant for a license to determine if the applicant satisfies the requirements of this chapter for the license.

History.

(§ 2 ch 50 SLA 2007)

Sec. 06.60.035.
Fees and expenses.

When an applicant submits an application for a license under this chapter to the department, the applicant shall pay to the department

an application fee in partial payment of those investigation expenses incurred by the department; and

an annual license fee for the period that terminates on December 31 after the date the license is issued; after this payment, the annual license fee is due every year, subject to renewal by the department.

An applicant shall pay all reasonable costs and reasonable investigative fees incurred by the department before the department issues a license.

The fees imposed by this section are in addition to the fees charged by the registry and the business license fees assessed under AS 43.70 (Alaska Business License Act).

The department may establish by regulation the amount and manner of payment of application fees, examination fees, license fees, permit fees, investigation fees, and all administrative or other fees or penalties under this chapter. The fees established under this chapter are nonrefundable.

History.

(§ 2 ch 50 SLA 2007; am §§ 10 — 12 ch 61 SLA 2010)

Cross references. —

For the amounts of the application fee and license fee to be imposed and collected by the department under (a)(1) and (a)(2) of this section pending the effective date of the regulations to be adopted by the department under (a) of the section under the authority set out in (d) of this section, see § 89(1), ch. 61, SLA 2010, in the 2010 Temporary and Special Acts.

Administrative Code. —

For licensing, see 3 AAC 14, art. 1.

For originator competency testing and continuing education, see 3 AAC 14, art. 3.

Sec. 06.60.038.
Prelicensing and relicensing education of mortgage loan originators.

Before being licensed as a mortgage loan originator, an individual shall complete at least 20 hours of education approved under (b) of this section. At a minimum, the education must include

three hours of instruction in federal statutes and regulations relating to mortgage origination, fraud prevention, consumer protection, the nontraditional mortgage marketplace, and fair lending;

three hours of instruction in ethics, including instruction on issues related to fraud prevention, consumer protection, and fair lending; and

two hours of training related to lending standards for the nontraditional mortgage product marketplace.

For the purposes of (a) of this section, a prelicensing education course must be approved under 12 U.S.C. 5104(c)(2) (Secure and Fair Enforcement for Mortgage Licensing Act of 2008). Review and approval of a prelicensing education course includes review and approval of the course provider.

Nothing in this section precludes a prelicensing education course that is approved under (b) of this section and that is provided by the employer of the applicant, an entity affiliated with the applicant, or a subsidiary or affiliate of an employer or entity affiliated with the applicant.

Prelicensing education may be offered in a classroom, on-line, or by other means approved under 12 U.S.C. 5104(c)(2) (Secure and Fair Enforcement for Mortgage Licensing Act of 2008).

History.

(§ 13 ch 61 SLA 2010)

Sec. 06.60.040.
Testing of mortgage loan originators.

Before being licensed as a mortgage loan originator, an individual shall pass, under the standards established by this section, a qualified written test on appropriate subject areas, including federal and state law, under 12 U.S.C. 5104(d) (Secure and Fair Enforcement for Mortgage Licensing Act of 2008).

The department shall treat a written test as a qualified written test for purposes of (a) of this section if the department finds that the test adequately measures the applicant’s knowledge and comprehension in appropriate subject areas, including

ethics; and

federal and state statutes and regulations relating to mortgage origination, fraud prevention, consumer protection, the nontraditional mortgage marketplace, and fair lending.

This section does not prohibit a test provider approved by the registry from providing a test at the location of the employer of the applicant, the location of a subsidiary or affiliate of the employer of the applicant, or the location of an entity with which the applicant holds an exclusive arrangement to conduct the business of a mortgage loan originator.

To pass a qualified written test, an applicant must answer at least 75 percent of the questions correctly.

An individual may retake a test three consecutive times, but each consecutive taking of a test must occur at least 30 days after taking the preceding test.

After failing three consecutive takings of the same test, an individual shall wait at least six months before retaking the test.

A licensed mortgage loan originator who fails to maintain a valid license for a period of five years or longer shall retake the test. The period without a valid license under this subsection does not include the time the individual is a registered mortgage loan originator.

The department may assess a fee for each administration of a qualified written test.

History.

(§ 2 ch 50 SLA 2007; am § 14 ch 61 SLA 2010)

Administrative Code. —

For licensing, see 3 AAC 14, art. 1.

For originator competency testing and continuing education, see 3 AAC 14, art. 3.

Sec. 06.60.045.
Bonding.

An applicant for a mortgage license shall file with the application submitted to the department under AS

06.60.020

, and an applicant for registration under AS

06.60.014

shall file with the application filed under AS

06.60.014

, a bond with one or more sureties. The department shall establish by regulation the amount of the required bond and the standards and procedures for recovery on the bond. The bond must be satisfactory to the department.

The bond required by (a) of this section shall be for the use of the department, the Department of Law, or another person to recover for a claim for relief against the obligor under this chapter. The bond must state that the obligor will faithfully conform to and abide by the provisions of this chapter and all regulations adopted under this chapter and will pay the department, the Department of Law, or another person all money that may become due or owing to the department, the Department of Law, or the other person from the obligor under this chapter.

An applicant for a mortgage license that covers more than one location or an applicant for registration that covers more than one location is not required to file more than one bond.

The bond required under (a) of this section must be continuous until three years after the department revokes or otherwise terminates the license or registration.

If the department determines that the bond required under (a) of this section is unsatisfactory for any reason, the department may require the mortgage licensee or the registered depository institution to file with the department, within 10 days after the receipt of a written demand from the department, an additional bond that complies with the provisions of this section.

History.

(§ 2 ch 50 SLA 2007; am §§ 15, 16 ch 61 SLA 2010; am §§ 4 — 7 ch 51 SLA 2016)

Cross references. —

For the amount of the bond required by (a) of this section pending the effective date of regulations to be adopted by the department under (a) of this section, see § 89(2), ch. 61, SLA 2010, in the 2010 Temporary and Special Acts.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2016 amendment, effective January 1, 2017, in (a), inserted “, and an applicant for registration under AS

06.60.014

shall file with the application filed under AS

06.60.014

,” preceding “a bond”; in (c), inserted “or an applicant for registration that covers more than one location” following “location”; in (d), inserted “or registration” following “license”; in (e), inserted “or the registered depository institution” following “mortgage licensee”.

Sec. 06.60.050.
Decision on application.

Within 30 days after the date the department determines that it has received a complete application under AS

06.60.020

, the required bond if the application is for a mortgage license, and any required fees and investigative costs, the department shall either grant or deny the license.

If the department denies the license, the department shall promptly notify the applicant. The notification must state the reason for the denial and that the applicant is entitled to a hearing on the denial.

History.

(§ 2 ch 50 SLA 2007; am § 17 ch 61 SLA 2010)

Administrative Code. —

For licensing, see 3 AAC 14, art. 1.

Sec. 06.60.060.
Determinations before licensing.

Before granting a license under this chapter, the department shall determine, at a minimum, that

the applicant has complied with the requirements of this chapter for obtaining the license;

the applicant, including a control person of the applicant, has

never had a mortgage lender, mortgage broker, or mortgage loan originator license revoked by a governmental jurisdiction, except that, if a revocation has been formally vacated, the revocation is not considered a revocation under this paragraph; in this paragraph,

a control person of an applicant for a mortgage license includes an entity over which the control person exercised control at the time of the revocation; and

an applicant for a mortgage loan originator license includes an entity over which the applicant exercised control at the time of the revocation;

not been convicted of, or pled guilty or no contest to, a felony in a domestic, foreign, or military court during the seven-year period preceding the date of the application, or at any time preceding the date of application if the felony involved an act of fraud, dishonesty, a breach of trust, or money laundering; however, if the applicant has been pardoned for the conviction, the conviction is not considered a conviction under this subparagraph;

demonstrated financial responsibility, character, and general fitness sufficient to command the confidence of the community and to warrant a determination that the applicant will operate honestly, fairly, and efficiently within the purposes of this chapter; under this subparagraph,

an applicant does not show financial responsibility if the applicant has shown inattention to or neglect of the management of the person’s own financial condition;

a determination that an applicant has not shown financial responsibility may include current outstanding judgments against the applicant, except judgments related solely to a claim related to medical expenses; current outstanding tax liens or other government liens and filings against the applicant; foreclosures of the applicant’s property within the three years preceding the date of the application; and a pattern by the applicant of seriously delinquent accounts within the three years preceding the date of the application;

the applicant for a mortgage loan originator license

has completed the prelicensing education requirement described in AS

06.60.038

;

has passed a test that meets the requirements described in AS

06.60.040

; and

has paid the fund fee as required by AS

06.60.550

; and

the applicant for a mortgage license has provided a bond as required by AS

06.60.045

.

History.

(§ 2 ch 50 SLA 2007; am § 18 ch 61 SLA 2010)

Administrative Code. —

For licensing, see 3 AAC 14, art. 1.

Secs. 06.60.065 — 06.60.075.
Determinations for originator licensing; form and contents of license; license availability. [Repealed, § 87 ch 61 SLA 2010.]

Administrative Code. —

For licensing, see 3 AAC 14, art. 1.

Sec. 06.60.077.
Authority to issue provisional license.

Subject to (b) of this section, the department may issue a provisional license to an applicant for a mortgage license if the department has made all determinations under AS

06.60.060

necessary for licensure except those determinations based on the criminal history background check required by AS

06.60.027

.

A provisional license may be granted under this section if the

receipt by the department of the results of the criminal history background check is delayed more than 60 days after the date the fingerprints are submitted to the governmental agency that conducts the criminal history background check; and

delay described in (1) of this subsection is not caused by the applicant.

The duration of a provisional license issued under this section may not exceed 90 days.

History.

(§ 19 ch 61 SLA 2010)